Alabama, session 2026rs, HB213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 33-1-2, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§33-1-2
(a) There shall be a state agency known as the Alabama
State Port Authority, hereinafter sometimes referred to as the
port authority. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
whenever any act, section of this code, or any other provision
of law refers to the Alabama State Docks Department, or the
Alabama State Port Authority it shall be deemed a reference to
the Alabama State Port Authority.
(b) The port authority shall promote, supervise,
control, manage, and direct the state docks and all other
state lands included within the jurisdiction of this chapter
and shall maintain and operate all the improvements and
facilities authorized by this chapter. The port authority is a
body corporate and shall be constituted as provided in this
chapter."
Page 1

chapter."
HB213 Enrolled
Section 2. The Code Commissioner, at times determined
appropriate, shall change all references to the State Port
Authority, the Alabama State Docks Department, and the Alabama
State Port Authority in the Code of Alabama 1975, to the
Alabama Port Authority.
Section 3. Chapter 13 of Title 33, consisting of
Sections 33-13-1 through 33-13-13, Code of Alabama 1975, which
established the Alabama Port Authority, is repealed, thereby
terminating the Alabama Port Authority because the Alabama
Port Authority is an obsolete entity.
Section 4. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 2

Section 4. This act shall become effective immediately.
HB213 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 12-Feb-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 26-Feb-26 Amended and Passed

House 03-Mar-26 Concurred in Senate
Amendment


Page 3